Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.255

University designated as recipient of all federal aid to agricultural experiment stations—Assent to congressional grants to university.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Washington is hereby given, in pursuance of the requirements of section nine of said act of congress, approved March 2, 1887, to the granting of money therein made to the establishment of experiment stations in accordance with section one of said last mentioned act, and assent is hereby given to carry out, within the state of Washington, every provision of said act.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.255. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 248 s 11; RRS s 4582; prior: 1897 c 118 s 200; 1891 c 145 s 11. Formerly RCW 28.80.220.]